Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB589.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Employer" means:
1. Any incorporated city, consolidated local government, unified local
government, urban-county government, or charter county government
operating under the laws of this Commonwealth, and the offices and
agencies thereof; or
2. A fire protection district organized under KRS Chapter 75; and
(b) "Firefighter" means any member of a paid:
1. Municipal fire department organized under KRS Chapter 67A, 67C, or
95; or
2. Fire protection district organized under KRS Chapter 75.
(2) Subject to the limitations in subsection (7) of this section, an employer may
employ individuals as firefighters under this section who have retired from the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the County Employees Retirement
System, or the State Police Retirement System.
(3) To be eligible for employment under this section, an individual shall have:
(a) Participated in the Firefighters Foundation Program fund under KRS
95A.200 to 95A.300, or retired as a firefighter under KRS Chapter 95;
(b) Retired with at least twenty (20) years of service credit;
(c) Been separated from service for the period required in KRS 61.637 and
78.5540 so that the member's retirement is not voided;
(d) Retired with no administrative charges pending;
(e) Retired with no preexisting agreement between the individual and the
Page 1 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
employer prior to the individual's retirement for the individual to return to
work for the employer; and
(f) Successfully completed a Candidate Physical Ability Test (CPAT) prior to
reemployment if the individual has not served as a firefighter for one (1)
year or more as of the date of reemployment.
(4) Individuals employed under this section shall:
(a) Be employed for a period not to exceed one (1) year. The one (1) year
employment period may be renewed annually at the discretion of the
employer;
(b) Receive compensation according to the standard procedures applicable to
the employer; and
(c) Be employed based upon need as determined by the employer.
(5) Notwithstanding any provisions of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 18A.225 to 18A.2287,
61.510 to 61.705, or 78.510 to 78.852 to the contrary:
(a) Individuals employed under this section shall continue to receive all
retirement and health insurance benefits to which they were entitled upon
retiring in the applicable system administered by Kentucky Retirement
Systems or the County Employees Retirement System;
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, individuals employed
under this section shall not be eligible to receive health insurance coverage
through the employer;
(c) The employer shall pay the employer's normal cost contribution as defined
by KRS 78.635 on any firefighter employed in a regular full-time position as
defined by KRS 78.510, but shall not pay any other employer contributions
or retiree health expense reimbursements to the Kentucky Retirement
Systems or County Employees Retirement System required by KRS
61.637(17) or 78.5540(4) for individuals employed under this section;
Page 2 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
(d) Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, the employer shall
not pay any insurance contributions to the Kentucky Employees Health
Plan as provided by KRS 18A.225 to 18A.2287 for individuals employed
under this section; and
(e) The legislative body of the employer may by legislative action provide or
authorize provision of health insurance coverage for individuals employed
under this section, subject to the terms and conditions established by the
employer.
(6) Individuals employed under this section shall be subject to any merit system, civil
service, or other legislative due process provisions applicable to the employer. A
decision not to renew a one (1) year employment term under this section shall not
be considered a disciplinary action or deprivation subject to due process.
(7) An employer shall be limited in the number of retired firefighters that it may
employ under this section as follows:
(a) An employer that employed an average of five (5) or fewer firefighters over
the course of the immediately preceding calendar year shall not be limited
in the number of firefighters that it may employ under this section;
(b) An employer that employed an average of more than five (5) but fewer than
one hundred (100) firefighters over the course of the immediately preceding
calendar year shall not employ more than five (5) firefighters under this
section, or a number equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the firefighters
employed by the employer in the immediately preceding calendar year,
whichever is greater; and
(c) An employer that employed an average of one hundred (100) or more
firefighters over the course of the immediately preceding calendar year shall
not employ more than twenty-five (25) firefighters under this section, or a
number equal to ten percent (10%) of the firefighters employed by the
Page 3 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
employer in the immediately preceding calendar year, whichever is greater.
Section 2. KRS 61.637 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A retired member who is receiving monthly retirement payments under any of the
provisions of KRS 61.510 to 61.705 and 78.510 to 78.852 and who is reemployed
as an employee by a participating agency prior to August 1, 1998, shall have his or
her retirement payments suspended for the duration of reemployment. Monthly
payments shall not be suspended for a retired member who is reemployed if he or
she anticipates that he or she will receive less than the maximum permissible
earnings as provided by the Federal Social Security Act in compensation as a result
of reemployment during the calendar year. The payments shall be suspended at the
beginning of the month in which the reemployment occurs.
(2) Employer and employee contributions shall be made as provided in KRS 61.510 to
61.705 and 78.510 to 78.852 on the compensation paid during reemployment,
except where monthly payments were not suspended as provided in subsection (1)
of this section or would not increase the retired member's last monthly retirement
allowance by at least one dollar ($1), and the member shall be credited with
additional service credit.
(3) In the month following the termination of reemployment, retirement allowance
payments shall be reinstated under the plan under which the member was receiving
payments prior to reemployment.
(4) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the payments suspended in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section shall be paid retroactively to the
retired member, or his or her estate, if he or she does not receive more than
the maximum permissible earnings as provided by the Federal Social Security
Act in compensation from participating agencies during any calendar year of
reemployment.
(b) If the retired member is paid suspended payments retroactively in accordance
Page 4 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
with this section, employee contributions deducted during his or her period of
reemployment, if any, shall be refunded to the retired employee, and no
service credit shall be earned for the period of reemployment.
(c) If the retired member is not eligible to be paid suspended payments for his or
her period of reemployment as an employee, his or her retirement allowance
shall be recomputed under the plan under which the member was receiving
payments prior to reemployment as follows:
1. The retired member's final compensation shall be recomputed using
creditable compensation for his or her period of reemployment;
however, the final compensation resulting from the recalculation shall
not be less than that of the member when his or her retirement allowance
was last determined;
2. If the retired member initially retired on or subsequent to his or her
normal retirement date, his or her retirement allowance shall be
recomputed by using the formula in KRS 61.595(1);
3. If the retired member initially retired prior to his or her normal
retirement date, his or her retirement allowance shall be recomputed
using the formula in KRS 61.595(2), except that the member's age used
in computing benefits shall be his or her age at the time of his or her
initial retirement increased by the number of months of service credit
earned for service performed during reemployment;
4. The retirement allowance payments resulting from the recomputation
under this subsection shall be payable in the month following the
termination of reemployment in lieu of payments under subparagraph 3.
of this paragraph. The member shall not receive less in benefits as a
result of the recomputation than he or she was receiving prior to
reemployment or would receive as determined under KRS 61.691; and
Page 5 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
5. Any retired member who was reemployed prior to March 26, 1974, shall
begin making contributions to the system in accordance with the
provisions of this section on the first day of the month following March
26, 1974.
(5) A retired member, or his or her estate, shall pay to the retirement fund the total
amount of payments which are not suspended in accordance with subsection (1) of
this section if the member received more than the maximum permissible earnings as
provided by the Federal Social Security Act in compensation from participating
agencies during any calendar year of reemployment, except the retired member or
his or her estate may repay the lesser of the total amount of payments which were
not suspended or fifty cents ($0.50) of each dollar earned over the maximum
permissible earnings during reemployment if under age sixty-five (65), or one
dollar ($1) for every three dollars ($3) earned if over age sixty-five (65).
(6) (a) As used in this section, "reemployment" or "reinstatement"[ as used in this
section] shall not include a retired member who has been ordered reinstated
by the Personnel Board under authority of KRS 18A.095.
(b) 1. A retired member who has been ordered reinstated without loss of pay
by the Personnel Board under authority of KRS 18A.095 or by court
order or by order of the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights and
accepts employment by an agency participating in the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System, State Police Retirement System, or
County Employees Retirement System shall void his or her retirement
by reimbursing the system in the full amount of his or her retirement
allowance payments received, including any health insurance benefits
paid to or on behalf of the member.
2. Within twelve (12) months of the date of the final order of the Personnel
Board, the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights, or the court, the
Page 6 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
member shall repay the system the full amount of his or her retirement
allowance payments and health insurance benefits by lump sum or enter
into an agreement with the Authority for repayment by installments.
3. Once the system has been fully reimbursed for the benefits paid to the
member and on the member's behalf, additional contributions and
service credit based on the reinstated employment shall be added to the
member's account.
(7) (a) Effective August 1, 1998, the provisions of subsections (1) to (4) of this
section shall no longer apply to a retired member who is reemployed in a
position covered by the same retirement system from which the member
retired. Reemployed retired members shall be treated as new members upon
reemployment. Any retired member whose reemployment date preceded
August 1, 1998, who does not elect, within sixty (60) days of notification by
the retirement systems, to remain under the provisions of subsections (1) to
(4) of this section shall be deemed to have elected to participate under this
subsection.
(b) A retired member whose disability retirement was discontinued pursuant to
KRS 61.615 and who is reemployed in one (1) of the systems administered by
the Kentucky Retirement Systems or County Employees Retirement System
prior to his or her normal retirement date shall have his or her accounts
combined upon termination for determining eligibility for benefits. If the
member is eligible for retirement, the member's service and creditable
compensation earned as a result of his or her reemployment shall be used in
the calculation of benefits, except that the member's final compensation shall
not be less than the final compensation last used in determining his or her
retirement allowance. The member shall not change beneficiary or payment
option designations. This provision shall apply to members reemployed on or
Page 7 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
after August 1, 1998.
(8) If a retired member accepts employment or begins serving as a volunteer with an
employer participating in the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement
Systems or County Employees Retirement System within twelve (12) months of his
or her retirement date, the retired member shall notify the Authority and the
participating employer shall submit the information required or requested by the
Authority to confirm the individual's employment or volunteer status. The retired
member shall not be required to notify the Authority regarding any employment or
volunteer service with a participating agency that is accepted after twelve (12)
months following his or her retirement date.
(9) If the retired member is under a contract to provide services as an independent
contractor or leased employee to an employer participating in the systems
administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or County Employees Retirement
System within twelve (12) months of his or her retirement date, the member shall
submit a copy of that contract to the Authority, and the Authority shall determine if
the member is an independent contractor or leased employee for purposes of
retirement benefits. The retired member and the participating employer shall submit
the information required or requested by the Authority to confirm the individual's
status as an independent contractor or leased employee. The retired member shall
not be required to notify the Authority regarding any services entered into as an
independent contractor or leased employee with a participating agency that the
employee enters into after twelve (12) months following his or her retirement date.
(10) If a member is receiving a retirement allowance, or has filed the forms required for
a retirement allowance, and is employed within one (1) month of the member's
initial retirement date in a position that is required to participate in the same
retirement system from which the member retired, the member's retirement shall be
voided and the member shall repay to the retirement system all benefits received.
Page 8 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
The member shall contribute to the member account established for him or her prior
to his or her voided retirement. The retirement allowance for which the member
shall be eligible upon retirement shall be determined by total service and creditable
compensation.
(11) (a) If a member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System retires from a
department which participates in more than one (1) retirement system and is
reemployed within one (1) month of his or her initial retirement date by the
same department in a position participating in another retirement system, the
retired member's retirement allowance shall be suspended for the first month
of his or her retirement, and the member shall repay to the retirement system
all benefits received for the month.
(b) A retired member of the County Employees Retirement System who after
initial retirement is hired by the county from which the member retired shall
be considered to have been hired by the same employer.
(12) (a) If a hazardous member who retired prior to age fifty-five (55), or a
nonhazardous member who retired prior to age sixty-five (65), is reemployed
within six (6) months of the member's termination by the same employer, the
member shall obtain from his or her previous and current employers a copy of
the job description established by the employers for the position and a
statement of the duties performed by the member for the position from which
he or she retired and for the position in which he or she has been reemployed.
(b) The job descriptions and statements of duties shall be filed with the retirement
office.
(13) If the retirement system determines that the retired member has been employed in a
position with the same principal duties as the position from which the member
retired:
(a) The member's retirement allowance shall be suspended during the period that
Page 9 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
begins on the month in which the member is reemployed and ends six (6)
months after the member's termination;
(b) The retired member shall repay to the retirement system all benefits paid from
systems administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or County Employees
Retirement System under reciprocity, including medical insurance benefits,
that the member received after reemployment began;
(c) Upon termination, or subsequent to expiration of the six (6) month period
from the date of termination, the retired member's retirement allowance based
on his or her initial retirement account shall no longer be suspended, and the
member shall receive the amount to which he or she is entitled, including an
increase as provided by KRS 61.691;
(d) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, if the position in which a
retired member is employed after initial retirement is a regular full-time
position, the retired member shall contribute to a second member account
established for him or her in the retirement system. Service credit gained after
the member's date of reemployment shall be credited to the second member
account; and
(e) Upon termination, the retired member shall be entitled to benefits payable
from his or her second retirement account.
(14) (a) If the retirement system determines that the retired member has not been
reemployed in a position with the same principal duties as the position from
which he or she retired, the retired member shall continue to receive his or her
retirement allowance.
(b) If the position is a regular full-time position, the member shall contribute to a
second member account in the retirement system.
(15) (a) If a retired member is reemployed at least one (1) month after initial
retirement in a different position, or at least six (6) months after initial
Page 10 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
retirement in the same position, and prior to normal retirement age, the retired
member shall contribute to a second member account in the retirement system
and continue to receive a retirement allowance from the first member account.
(b) Service credit gained after reemployment shall be credited to the second
member account. Upon termination, the retired member shall be entitled to
benefits payable from the second member account.
(16) A retired member who is reemployed and contributing to a second member account
shall not be eligible to purchase service credit under any of the provisions of KRS
16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or 78.510 to 78.852 which he or she was
eligible to purchase prior to his or her initial retirement.
(17) Notwithstanding any provision of subsections (1) to (7)(a) and (10) to (15) of this
section, the following shall apply to retired members who are reemployed by an
agency participating in one (1) of the systems administered by Kentucky
Retirement Systems or County Employees Retirement System on or after
September 1, 2008:
(a) If a member is receiving a retirement allowance from one (1) of the systems
administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or County Employees
Retirement System, or has filed the forms required to receive a retirement
allowance from one (1) of the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement
Systems or County Employees Retirement System, and is employed in a
regular full-time position required to participate in one (1) of the systems
administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or County Employees
Retirement System or is employed in a position that is not considered regular
full-time with an agency participating in one (1) of the systems administered
by Kentucky Retirement Systems or County Employees Retirement System
within one (1) month following the member's initial retirement date, the
member's retirement shall be voided, and the member shall repay to the
Page 11 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
retirement system all benefits received, including any health insurance
benefits. If the member is returning to work in a regular full-time position
required to participate in one (1) of the systems administered by Kentucky
Retirement Systems:
1. The member shall contribute to a member account established for him or
her in one (1) of the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement
Systems or County Employees Retirement System, and employer
contributions shall be paid on behalf of the member by the participating
employer; and
2. Upon subsequent retirement, the member shall be eligible for a
retirement allowance based upon total service and creditable
compensation, including any additional service or creditable
compensation earned after his or her initial retirement was voided;
(b) If a member is receiving a retirement allowance from one (1) of the systems
administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or County Employees
Retirement System and is employed in a regular full-time position required to
participate in one (1) of the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement
Systems or County Employees Retirement System after a one (1) month
period following the member's initial retirement date, the member may
continue to receive his or her retirement allowance during the period of
reemployment subject to the following provisions:
1. If a member is reemployed by a participating agency within twelve (12)
months of the member's retirement date, the participating agency shall
certify in writing on a form prescribed by the Authority that no
prearranged agreement existed between the employee and agency prior
to the employee's retirement for the employee to return to work with the
participating agency. If an elected official is reelected to a new term of
Page 12 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
office in the same position as the elected official held prior to retirement
and takes office within twelve (12) months of his or her retirement date,
he or she shall be deemed by the Authority as having a prearranged
agreement under the provisions of this subparagraph and shall have his
or her retirement voided. If the participating agency fails to complete the
certification, the member's retirement shall be voided and the provisions
of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall apply to the member and the
employer. Employment that is accepted by the retired member after
twelve (12) months following the member's retirement date shall not
constitute a prearranged agreement under this paragraph;
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS Chapter 16, 61, or 78 to
the contrary, the member shall not contribute to the systems and shall
not earn any additional benefits for any work performed during the
period of reemployment;
3. Except as provided by KRS 70.291 to 70.293, 95.022, Section 1 of this
Act, and 164.952 and except for any retiree employed as a school
resource officer as defined by KRS 158.441 or as a Kentucky guardian
as defined by KRS 158.4431, the employer shall pay employer
contributions as specified by KRS 61.565, 61.702, and 78.635, as
applicable, on all creditable compensation earned by the employee
during the period of reemployment. The additional contributions paid
shall be used to reduce the unfunded actuarial liability of the systems;
and
4. Except as provided by KRS 70.291 to 70.293, 95.022, Section 1 of this
Act, and 164.952 and except for any retiree employed as a school
resource officer as defined by KRS 158.441 or as a Kentucky guardian
as defined by KRS 158.4431, the employer shall be required to
Page 13 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
reimburse the systems for the cost of the health insurance premium paid
by the systems to provide coverage for the retiree, not to exceed the cost
of the single premium. Effective July 1, 2015, local school boards shall
not be required to pay the reimbursement required by this subparagraph
for retirees employed by the board for eighty (80) days or less during the
fiscal year. Effective August 1, 2024, the Department of Education shall
pay for the health reimbursements required by this subparagraph for a
retiree who participated in a hazardous position prior to July 1, 2003, in
one (1) of the systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement
Systems or the County Employees Retirement System, and who is
reemployed by a local school board;
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, a retired member
who qualifies as a volunteer for an employer participating in one (1) of the
systems administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or County Employees
Retirement System and who is receiving reimbursement of actual expenses, a
nominal fee for his or her volunteer services, or both, shall not be considered
an employee of the participating employer and shall not be subject to
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection if:
1. Prior to the retired member's most recent retirement date, he or she did
not receive creditable compensation from the participating employer in
which the retired member is performing volunteer services;
2. Any reimbursement or nominal fee received prior to the retired
member's most recent retirement date has not been credited as creditable
compensation to the member's account or utilized in the calculation of
the retired member's benefits;
3. The retired member has not purchased or received service credit under
any of the provisions of KRS 61.510 to 61.705 or 78.510 to 78.852 for
Page 14 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
service with the participating employer for which the retired member is
performing volunteer services; and
4. Other than the status of volunteer, the retired member does not become
an employee, leased employee, or independent contractor of the
employer for which he or she is performing volunteer services for a
period of at least twelve (12) months following the retired member's
most recent retirement date.
If a retired member, who provided volunteer services with a participating
employer under this paragraph violates any provision of this paragraph, then
he or she shall be deemed an employee of the participating employer as of the
date he or she began providing volunteer services and both the retired member
and the participating employer shall be subject to paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subsection for the period of volunteer service;
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, any mayor or member of a city
legislative body shall not be required to resign from his or her position as
mayor or as a member of the city legislative body in order to begin drawing
benefits from the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or
subject to any provision of this section as it relates solely to his or her service
as a mayor or member of the city legislative body if the mayor or member of a
city legislative body:
1. Has not participated in the County Employees Retirement System prior
to retirement, but is otherwise eligible to retire from the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System or the State Police Retirement System; or
2. Has been or is participating in the County Employees Retirement
System and is at least sixty-two (62) years of age. If a mayor or member
of a city legislative body who is at least sixty-two (62) years of age
retires from the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems
Page 15 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
but remains in office after his or her effective retirement date, the mayor
or member of the city legislative body shall not accrue any further
service credit or benefits in the systems administered by Kentucky
Retirement Systems for any employment occurring on or after the
effective retirement date;
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, any current or future part-time
adjunct instructor for the Kentucky Fire Commission who has not participated
in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System prior to retirement, but who is
otherwise eligible to retire from the County Employees Retirement System,
shall not be:
1. Required to resign from his or her position as a part-time adjunct
instructor for the Kentucky Fire Commission in order to begin drawing
benefits from the County Employees Retirement System; or
2. Subject to any provision of this section as it relates solely to his or her
service as a part-time adjunct instructor for the Kentucky Fire
Commission;
(f) If a member is receiving a retirement allowance from any of the retirement
systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems or County
Employees Retirement System and enters into a contract or becomes a leased
employee of an employer under contract with an employer participating in
one (1) of the systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems or
County Employees Retirement System:
1. At any time following retirement, if the Authority determines the
employment arrangement does qualify as an independent contractor or
leased employee, the member may continue to receive his or her
retirement allowance during the period of the contract;
2. Within one (1) month following the member's initial retirement date, if
Page 16 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
the Authority determines the employment arrangement does not qualify
as an independent contractor or leased employee, the member's
retirement shall be voided in accordance with paragraph (a) of this
subsection;
3. After one (1) month but within twelve (12) months following the
member's initial retirement, if the Authority determines the employment
arrangement does not qualify as an independent contractor or leased
employee and that a prearranged agreement existed between the member
and the agency for the member to return to work with the agency, the
member's retirement shall be voided in accordance with paragraph (a) of
this subsection;
4. After a twelve (12) month period following the member's initial
retirement, the member may continue to receive his or her retirement
allowance during the period of the contract and the member shall not be
required to notify the system or submit any documentation for purposes
of this section to the system; and
5. After twelve (12) months or more following the retired member's
retirement date, the initiation of a contract or the initial date of the
leased employment of a retired member by a participating agency shall
not constitute a prearranged agreement under this subsection; and
(g) The Authority shall issue a final determination regarding a certification of the
absence of a prearranged agreement or the retired member's qualification as
an independent contractor or leased employee as required under this section
no later than thirty (30) days after the retired member and participating
employer provide all required forms and additional information required by
the Authority.
(18) The Authority shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement the
Page 17 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
requirements of this section, including incorporating by reference board-prescribed
forms that a retired member and participating agency shall provide the systems
under subsections (8), (9), and (17) of this section.
Section 3. KRS 61.702 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in[For purposes of] this section:
(a) "Hospital and medical insurance plan" may include, at the board's discretion,
any one (1) or more of the following:
1. Any hospital and medical expense policy or certificate, provider-
sponsored integrated health delivery network, self-insured medical plan,
health maintenance organization contract, or other health benefit plan;
2. Any health savings account as permitted by 26 U.S.C. sec. 223 or health
reimbursement arrangement or a similar account as may be permitted by
26 U.S.C. sec. 105 or 106. Such arrangement or account, at the board's
discretion, may reimburse any medical expense permissible under 26
U.S.C. sec. 213; or
3. A medical insurance reimbursement program established by the board
through the promulgation of administrative regulation under which
members purchase individual health insurance coverage through a health
insurance exchange established under 42 U.S.C. sec. 18031 or 18041;
(b) "Monthly contribution rate" is the amount determined by the board based
upon the requirements of subsection (4)(a) to (d) of this section, except that
for members who began participating in the system on or after July 1, 2003,
the term shall mean the amount determined in subsection (4)(e) of this
section; and
(c) "Months of service" means the total months of combined service used to
determine benefits under the system, except service added to determine
disability benefits or service otherwise prohibited from being used to
Page 18 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
determine retiree health benefits under KRS 16.505 to 16.652 or 61.510 to
61.705 shall not be counted as "months of service." For current and former
employees of the Council on Postsecondary Education who were employed
prior to January 1, 1993, and who earn at least fifteen (15) years of service
credit in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, "months of service"
shall also include vested service in another retirement system other than the
Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System sponsored by the Council on
Postsecondary Education.
(2) (a) 1. The board of trustees of the system shall arrange by appropriate contract
or on a self-insured basis to provide a group hospital and medical
insurance plan coverage for:
a. Present and future recipients of a retirement allowance from the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System and the State Police
Retirement System; and
b. The spouse and each qualified dependent of a recipient who is a
former member or the beneficiary, provided the spouse and
dependent meet the requirements to participate in the hospital and
medical insurance plans established, contracted, or authorized by
the system.
2. Any recipient who chooses coverage under a hospital and medical
insurance plan shall pay, by payroll deduction from the retirement
allowance, electronic funds transfer, or by another method, the
difference between the premium cost of the hospital and medical
insurance plan coverage selected and the monthly contribution rate to
which he or she would be entitled under this section.
(b) 1. For present and future recipients of a retirement allowance from the
system who are not eligible for Medicare and for those recipients
Page 19 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
described in subparagraph 3.b. of this paragraph, the board may
authorize these participants to be included in the Kentucky Employees
Health Plan as provided by KRS 18A.225 to 18A.2287 and shall provide
benefits for recipients in the plan equal to those provided to state
employees having the same Medicare hospital and medical insurance
eligibility status. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute
except subparagraph 3.b. of this paragraph, system recipients shall be
included in the same class as current state employees for purposes of
determining medical insurance policies and premiums in the Kentucky
Employees Health Plan as provided by KRS 18A.225 to 18A.2287.
2. Regardless of age, if a recipient or the spouse or dependent child of a
recipient who elects coverage becomes eligible for Medicare, he or she
shall participate in the plans offered by the systems for Medicare
eligible recipients. Individuals participating in the Medicare eligible
plans may be required to obtain and pay for Medicare Part A and Part B
coverage, in order to participate in the Medicare eligible plans offered
by the system.
3. The system shall continue to provide the same hospital and medical
insurance plan coverage for recipients and qualifying dependents after
the age of sixty-five (65) as before the age of sixty-five (65), if:
a. The recipient is not eligible for Medicare coverage; or
b. The recipient would otherwise be eligible for Medicare coverage
but is subject to the Medicare Secondary Payer Act under 42
U.S.C. sec. 1395y(b) and has been reemployed by a participating
agency which offers the recipient a hospital and medical insurance
benefit or by a participating agency which is prevented from
offering or which does not offer a hospital and medical benefit to
Page 20 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
the recipient as a condition of reemployment under KRS 70.293,
95.022, Section 1 of this Act, or 164.952. Individuals who are
eligible, pursuant to this subdivision, to be included in the
Kentucky Employees Health Plan as provided by KRS 18A.225 to
18A.2287 may be rated as a separate class from other eligible
employees and retirees for the purpose of determining medical
insurance premiums.
(c) For recipients of a retirement allowance who are not eligible for the same
level of hospital and medical benefits as recipients living in Kentucky having
the same Medicare hospital and medical insurance eligibility status, the board
shall provide a medical insurance reimbursement plan as described in
subsection (6) of this section.
(d) Notwithstanding anything in KRS Chapter 16 or 61 to the contrary, the board
of trustees, in its discretion, may take necessary steps to ensure compliance
with 42 U.S.C. sec.[secs.] 300bb-1 et seq.
(3) (a) Each employer participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System
or the State Police Retirement System as provided in KRS 16.505 to 16.652 or
61.510 to 61.705 shall contribute to the insurance trust fund established under
KRS 61.701 the amount necessary to provide the monthly contribution rate as
provided for under this section. Such employer contribution rate shall be
developed by appropriate actuarial method as a part of the determination of
each respective employer contribution rate determined under KRS 61.565.
(b) 1. Each employer described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall deduct
from the creditable compensation of each member whose membership
date begins on or after September 1, 2008, an amount equal to one
percent (1%) of the member's creditable compensation. The deducted
amounts shall, at the discretion of the board, be credited to accounts
Page 21 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h), within the funds
established in KRS 16.510 and 61.515, or the insurance trust fund
established under KRS 61.701. Notwithstanding the provisions of this
paragraph, a transfer of assets between the accounts established pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h), within the funds established in KRS 16.510
and 61.515, and the insurance trust fund established under KRS 61.701
shall not be allowed.
2. The employer shall file the contributions as provided by subparagraph 1.
of this paragraph at the retirement office in accordance with KRS
61.675. Any interest or penalties paid on any delinquent contributions
shall be credited to accounts established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec.
401(h), within the funds established in KRS 16.510 and 61.515, or the
insurance trust fund established under KRS 61.701. Notwithstanding
any minimum compensation requirements provided by law, the
deductions provided by this paragraph shall be made, and the
compensation of the member shall be reduced accordingly.
3. Each employer shall submit payroll reports, contributions lists, and other
data as may be required by administrative regulation promulgated by the
board of trustees in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A.
4. Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions
made pursuant to this paragraph, and the payment of salary or
compensation less the deductions shall be a full and complete discharge
of all claims for services rendered by the person during the period
covered by the payment, except as to any benefits provided by KRS
16.505 to 16.652 or 61.510 to 61.705. No member may elect whether to
participate in, or choose the contribution amount to accounts established
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the funds established in KRS
Page 22 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
16.510 and 61.515, or the insurance trust fund established under KRS
61.701. The member shall have no option to receive the contribution
required by this paragraph directly instead of having the contribution
paid to accounts established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the
funds established in KRS 16.510 and 61.515, or the insurance trust fund
established under KRS 61.701. No member may receive a rebate or
refund of contributions. If a member establishes a membership date
prior to September 1, 2008, pursuant to KRS 61.552(2) or (3), then this
paragraph shall not apply to the member and all contributions previously
deducted in accordance with this paragraph shall be refunded to the
member without interest. The contribution made pursuant to this
paragraph shall not act as a reduction or offset to any other contribution
required of a member or recipient under KRS 16.505 to 16.652 or
61.510 to 61.705.
5. The board of trustees, at its discretion, may direct that the contributions
required by this paragraph be accounted for within accounts established
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the funds established in KRS
16.510 and 61.515, or the insurance trust fund established under KRS
61.701, through the use of separate accounts.
(4) (a) The premium required to provide hospital and medical insurance plan
coverage under this section shall be paid wholly or partly from funds
contributed by:
1. The recipient of a retirement allowance, by payroll deduction from his
or her retirement allowance, or by other method;
2. The insurance trust fund established under KRS 61.701 or accounts
established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the funds
established in KRS 16.510 and 61.515;
Page 23 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
3. Another state-administered retirement system, including the County
Employees Retirement System, under a reciprocal arrangement, except
that any portion of the premium paid from the funds specified by
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph under a reciprocal agreement shall not
exceed the amount that would be payable under this section if all the
member's service were in the systems administered by the Kentucky
Retirement Systems. If the board provides for cross-referencing of
insurance premiums, the employer's contribution for the working
member or spouse shall be applied toward the premium, and the
insurance trust fund established under KRS 61.701 or accounts
established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the funds
established in KRS 16.510 and 61.515 shall pay the balance; or
4. A combination of the fund sources described by subparagraphs 1. to 3.
of this paragraph.
Group rates under the hospital and medical insurance plan shall be made
available to the spouse, each dependent child, and each disabled child,
regardless of the disabled child's age, of a recipient who is a former member
or the beneficiary, if the premium for the hospital and medical insurance for
the spouse, each dependent child, and each disabled child, or beneficiary is
paid by payroll deduction from the retirement allowance, electronic funds
transfer, or by another method. For purposes of this subsection only, a child
shall be considered disabled if he or she has been determined to be eligible for
federal Social Security disability benefits or meets the dependent disability
standard established by the Department of Employee Insurance in the
Personnel Cabinet.
(b) For a member who began participating in the system prior to July 1, 2003, the
monthly contribution rate shall be paid by the system from the funds specified
Page 24 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection and shall be equal to a percentage of
the single premium to cover the retired member as follows:
1. One hundred percent (100%) of the monthly premium for single
coverage shall be paid for a retired member who had two hundred forty
(240) months of service or more upon retirement or for a retired member
who when he or she was an employee became disabled as a direct result
of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505 or as a result of a
duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621;
2. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the monthly premium for single coverage
shall be paid for a retired member who had less than two hundred forty
(240) months of service but at least one hundred eighty (180) months of
service upon retirement, provided such retired member agrees to pay the
remaining twenty-five percent (25%) by payroll deduction from his or
her retirement allowance, electronic funds transfer, or by another
method;
3. Fifty percent (50%) of the monthly premium for single coverage shall be
paid for a retired member who had less than one hundred eighty (180)
months of service but had at least one hundred twenty (120) months of
service upon retirement, provided such retired member agrees to pay the
remaining fifty percent (50%) by payroll deduction from his or her
retirement allowance, electronic funds transfer, or by another method; or
4. Twenty-five percent (25%) of the monthly premium for single coverage
shall be paid for a retired member who had less than one hundred twenty
(120) months of service but had at least forty-eight (48) months of
service upon retirement, provided such retired member agrees to pay the
remaining seventy-five percent (75%) by payroll deduction from his or
her retirement allowance, electronic funds transfer, or by another
Page 25 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
method.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, for a member participating
in the system prior to July 1, 2003, who:
1. Dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505
or dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621, the
monthly premium shall be paid for his or her spouse so long as the
spouse remains eligible for a monthly retirement benefit;
2. Becomes totally and permanently disabled as defined in KRS 16.582 as
a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505 or
becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS
61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the
monthly premium shall be paid for his or her spouse so long as the
member and the spouse individually remain eligible for a monthly
retirement benefit; and
3. Dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505,
dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621,
becomes totally and permanently disabled as defined in KRS 16.582 as a
direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505, or
becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS
61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the
monthly premium shall be paid for each dependent child as defined in
KRS 16.505, so long as the member remains eligible for a monthly
retirement benefit, unless deceased, and each dependent child
individually remains eligible under KRS 16.505.
(d) 1. For a member who began participating in the system prior to July 1,
2003, who was determined to be in a hazardous position in the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System or in a position in the State Police
Page 26 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
Retirement System, or who is receiving a retirement allowance based on
General Assembly service, the funds specified under paragraph (a)2. of
this subsection shall also pay a percentage of the monthly contribution
rate sufficient to fund the premium costs for hospital and medical
insurance coverage for the spouse and for each dependent child of a
recipient.
2. The percentage of the monthly contribution rate paid for the spouse and
each dependent child of a recipient who was in a hazardous position or
who is receiving a retirement allowance based on General Assembly
service in accordance with subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be
based solely on the member's service in a hazardous position using the
formula in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(e) For members who begin participating in the system on or after July 1, 2003:
1. Participation in the insurance benefits provided under this section shall
not be allowed until the member has earned at least one hundred twenty
(120) months of service in the state-administered retirement systems,
except that for members who begin participating in the system on or
after September 1, 2008, participation in the insurance benefits provided
under this section shall not be allowed until the member has earned at
least one hundred eighty (180) months of service credited under KRS
16.543(1) or 61.543(1), or another state-administered retirement system.
2. A member who meets the minimum service requirements as provided by
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall upon retirement be eligible for
the following monthly contribution rate to be paid on his or her behalf,
or on behalf of the spouse or dependent of a member with service in a
hazardous position, from the funds specified under paragraph (a)2. of
this subsection:
Page 27 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
a. For members with service in a nonhazardous position, a monthly
insurance contribution of ten dollars ($10) for each year of service
as a participating employee in a nonhazardous position;
b. For members with service in a hazardous position or who
participate in the State Police Retirement System, a monthly
insurance contribution of fifteen dollars ($15) for each year of
service as a participating employee in a hazardous position or the
State Police Retirement System; and
c. Upon the death of the retired member, the beneficiary, if the
beneficiary is the member's spouse, shall be entitled to a monthly
insurance contribution of ten dollars ($10) for each year of service
the member attained as a participating employee in a hazardous
position.
3. The minimum service requirement to participate in benefits as provided
by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be waived for a member who
receives a satisfactory determination of a hazardous disability that is a
direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505, and the
member shall be entitled to the benefits payable under this subsection as
though the member had twenty (20) years of service in a hazardous
position.
4. The minimum service required to participate in benefits as provided by
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be waived for a member who is
disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621
and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(b), and the
member shall be entitled to the benefits payable under this subsection as
though the member had twenty (20) years of service in a nonhazardous
position.
Page 28 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph, the minimum service
requirement to participate in benefits as provided by subparagraph 1. of
this paragraph shall be waived for a for a member who dies as a direct
result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505, who becomes
totally and permanently disabled as defined in KRS 16.582 as a direct
result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505, who dies as a
result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621, or who
becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS
61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a),
and the premium for the member, the member's spouse, and for each
dependent child as defined in KRS 16.505 shall be paid in full by the
systems so long as the member, member's spouse, or dependent child
individually remains eligible for a monthly retirement benefit.
6. Except as provided by subparagraph 5. of this paragraph, the monthly
insurance contribution amount shall be increased:
a. On July 1 of each year by one and one-half percent (1.5%). The
increase shall be cumulative and shall continue to accrue after the
member's retirement for as long as a monthly insurance
contribution is payable to the retired member or beneficiary but
shall not apply to any increase in the contribution attributable to
the increase specified by subdivision b. of this subparagraph; and
b. On January 1 of each year by five dollars ($5) for members who
have accrued an additional full year of service as a participating
employee beyond the career threshold, subject to the following
restrictions:
i. The additional insurance contribution provided by this
subdivision shall only be applied to the monthly contribution
Page 29 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
amounts provided under subparagraph 2.a. and b. of this
paragraph;
ii. The additional insurance contribution provided by this
subdivision shall only be payable towards the health plans
offered by the system to retirees who are not eligible for
Medicare or for reimbursements provided to retirees not
eligible for Medicare pursuant to subsection (6)(a)2. of this
section; and
iii. In order for the annual increase to occur as provided by this
subdivision, the funding level of retiree health benefits for
the system in which the employee is receiving the additional
insurance contribution shall be at least ninety percent (90%)
as of the most recent actuarial valuation and be projected by
the actuary to remain ninety percent (90%) for the year in
which the increase is provided.
7. The benefits of this paragraph provided to a member whose participation
begins on or after July 1, 2003, shall not be considered as benefits
protected by the inviolable contract provisions of KRS 16.652 or
61.692. The General Assembly reserves the right to suspend or reduce
the benefits conferred in this paragraph if in its judgment the welfare of
the Commonwealth so demands.
8. An employee whose membership date is on or after September 1, 2008,
who retires and is reemployed in a regular full-time position required to
participate in the system or the County Employees Retirement System
shall not be eligible for health insurance coverage or benefits provided
by this section and shall take coverage with his or her employing agency
during the period of reemployment in a regular full-time position.
Page 30 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
9. As used in[For purposes of] this paragraph:
a. "Career threshold" for a member with service in a nonhazardous
position means twenty-seven (27) years of service credited under
KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), 78.615(1), or another state-
administered retirement system and for a member with service in a
hazardous position means the service requirements specified by
KRS 16.577(2) or (3) or 16.583(6)(b), as applicable; and
b. "Funding level" means the actuarial value of assets divided by the
actuarially accrued liability expressed as a percentage that is
determined and reported by the system's actuary in the annual
actuarial valuation.
(f) For members with service in another state-administered retirement system
who select hospital and medical insurance plan coverage through the system:
1. The system shall compute the member's combined service, including
service credit in another state-administered retirement system, and
calculate the portion of the member's premium monthly contribution rate
to be paid by the funds specified under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection
according to the criteria established in paragraphs (a) to (e) of this
subsection. Each state-administered retirement system shall pay
annually to the insurance trust fund established under KRS 61.701 the
portion of the system's cost of the retiree's monthly contribution for
single coverage for hospital and medical insurance plan which shall be
equal to the percentage of the member's number of months of service in
the other state-administered retirement plan divided by his or her total
combined service and in conjunction with the reciprocal agreement
established between the system and the other state-administered
retirement systems. The amounts paid by the other state-administered
Page 31 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
retirement plans and by the Kentucky Retirement Systems from funds
specified under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection shall not be more than
one hundred percent (100%) of the monthly contribution adopted by the
respective boards of trustees;
2. A member may not elect coverage for hospital and medical benefits
through more than one (1) of the state-administered retirement systems;
and
3. A state-administered retirement system shall not pay any portion of a
member's monthly contribution for medical insurance unless the
member is a recipient or annuitant of the plan.
(5) Premiums paid for hospital and medical insurance coverage procured under
authority of this section shall be exempt from any premium tax which might
otherwise be required under KRS Chapter 136. The payment of premiums by the
funds described by subsection (4)(a)2. of this section shall not constitute taxable
income to an insured recipient. No commission shall be paid for hospital and
medical insurance procured under authority of this section.
(6) (a) The board shall promulgate an administrative regulation to establish a medical
insurance reimbursement plan to provide reimbursement for hospital and
medical insurance plan premiums of recipients of a retirement allowance who:
1. Are not eligible for the same level of hospital and medical benefits as
recipients living in Kentucky and having the same Medicare hospital
and medical insurance eligibility status; or
2. Are eligible for retiree health subsidies as provided by subsection (4)(e)
of this section, except for those recipients eligible for full premium
subsidies under subsection (4)(e)5. of this section. The reimbursement
program as provided by this subparagraph shall be available to the
recipient regardless of the hospital and medical insurance plans offered
Page 32 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
by the systems.
(b) An eligible recipient shall file proof of payment for hospital and medical
insurance plan coverage with the retirement office. Reimbursement to eligible
recipients shall be made on a quarterly basis. The recipient shall be eligible
for reimbursement of substantiated medical insurance premiums for an
amount not to exceed the total monthly contribution rate determined under
subsection (4) of this section.
(c) For purposes of recipients described by paragraph (a)1. of this subsection, the
plan shall not be made available if all recipients are eligible for the same
coverage as recipients living in Kentucky.
Section 4. KRS 78.5536 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in[For purposes of] this section:
(a) "Hospital and medical insurance plan" may include, at the board's discretion,
any one (1) or more of the following:
1. Any hospital and medical expense policy or certificate, provider-
sponsored integrated health delivery network, self-insured medical plan,
health maintenance organization contract, or other health benefit plan;
2. Any health savings account as permitted by 26 U.S.C. sec. 223 or health
reimbursement arrangement or a similar account as may be permitted by
26 U.S.C. sec. 105 or 106. Such arrangement or account, at the board's
discretion, may reimburse any medical expense permissible under 26
U.S.C. sec. 213; or
3. A medical insurance reimbursement program established by the board
through the promulgation of administrative regulation under which
members purchase individual health insurance coverage through a health
insurance exchange established under 42 U.S.C. sec. 18031 or 18041;
(b) "Monthly contribution rate" shall be the amount determined by the board
Page 33 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
based upon the requirements of subsection (4)(a) to (d) of this section, except
that for members who began participating in the system on or after July 1,
2003, the term shall mean the amount determined in subsection (4)(e) of this
section; and
(c) "Months of service" shall mean the total months of combined service used to
determine benefits under the system, except service added to determine
disability benefits or service otherwise prohibited from being used to
determine retiree health benefits under KRS 78.510 to 78.852 shall not be
counted as "months of service."
(2) (a) 1. The board of trustees of the system shall arrange by appropriate contract
or on a self-insured basis to provide a group hospital and medical
insurance plan coverage for:
a. Present and future recipients of a retirement allowance from the
County Employees Retirement System; and
b. The spouse and each qualified dependent of a recipient who is a
former member or the beneficiary, provided the spouse and
dependent meet the requirements to participate in the hospital and
medical insurance plans established, contracted, or authorized by
the system.
2. Any recipient who chooses coverage under a hospital and medical
insurance plan shall pay, by payroll deduction from the retirement
allowance, electronic funds transfer, or by another method, the
difference between the premium cost of the hospital and medical
insurance plan coverage selected and the monthly contribution rate to
which he or she would be entitled under this section.
(b) 1. For present and future recipients of a retirement allowance from the
system who are not eligible for Medicare and for those recipients
Page 34 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
described in subparagraph 3.b. of this paragraph, the board may
authorize these participants to be included in the Kentucky Employees
Health Plan as provided by KRS 18A.225 to 18A.2287 and shall provide
benefits for recipients in the plan equal to those provided to state
employees having the same Medicare hospital and medical insurance
eligibility status. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute
except subparagraph 3.b. of this paragraph, system recipients shall be
included in the same class as current state employees for purposes of
determining medical insurance policies and premiums in the Kentucky
Employees Health Plan as provided by KRS 18A.225 to 18A.2287.
2. Regardless of age, if a recipient or the spouse or dependent child of a
recipient who elects coverage becomes eligible for Medicare, he or she
shall participate in the plans offered by the systems for Medicare
eligible recipients. Individuals participating in the Medicare eligible
plans may be required to obtain and pay for Medicare Part A and Part B
coverage in order to participate in the Medicare eligible plans offered by
the system.
3. The system shall continue to provide the same hospital and medical
insurance plan coverage for recipients and qualifying dependents after
the age of sixty-five (65) as before the age of sixty-five (65), if:
a. The recipient is not eligible for Medicare coverage; or
b. The recipient would otherwise be eligible for Medicare coverage
but is subject to the Medicare Secondary Payer Act under 42
U.S.C. sec. 1395y(b) and has been reemployed by a participating
agency which offers the recipient a hospital and medical insurance
benefit or by a participating agency which is prevented from
offering or which does not offer a hospital and medical benefit to
Page 35 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
the recipient as a condition of reemployment under KRS 70.293,
95.022, Section 1 of this Act, or 164.952. Individuals who are
eligible, pursuant to this subdivision, to be included in the
Kentucky Employees Health Plan as provided by KRS 18A.225 to
18A.2287 may be rated as a separate class from other eligible
employees and retirees for the purpose of determining medical
insurance premiums.
(c) For recipients of a retirement allowance who are not eligible for the same
level of hospital and medical benefits as recipients living in Kentucky having
the same Medicare hospital and medical insurance eligibility status, the board
shall provide a medical insurance reimbursement plan as described in
subsection (6) of this section.
(d) Notwithstanding anything in KRS Chapter 78 to the contrary, the board of
trustees, in its discretion, may take necessary steps to ensure compliance with
42 U.S.C. sec. 300bb-1 et seq.
(3) (a) Each employer participating in the County Employees Retirement System as
provided in KRS 78.510 to 78.852 shall contribute to the insurance trust fund
established by KRS 61.701 the amount necessary to provide the monthly
contribution rate as provided for under this section. Such employer
contribution rate shall be developed by appropriate actuarial method as a part
of the determination of each respective employer contribution rate determined
under KRS 78.635.
(b) 1. Each employer described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall deduct
from the creditable compensation of each member whose membership
date begins on or after July 1, 2003, and who is subject to the benefits
provided under subsection (4)(e) of this section, an amount equal to one
percent (1%) of the member's creditable compensation if the member is
Page 36 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
participating in a nonhazardous position and two percent (2%) of the
member's creditable compensation if the member is participating in a
hazardous position. The deducted amounts shall, at the discretion of the
board, be credited to accounts established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec.
401(h), within the funds established in KRS 78.520, or the insurance
trust fund established under KRS 61.701. Notwithstanding the
provisions of this paragraph, a transfer of assets between the accounts
established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h), within the funds
established in KRS 78.520, and the insurance trust fund established
under KRS 61.701 shall not be allowed.
2. The employer shall file the contributions as provided by subparagraph 1.
of this paragraph at the retirement office in accordance with KRS
78.625. Any interest or penalties paid on any delinquent contributions
shall be credited to accounts established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec.
401(h), within the funds established in KRS 78.520, or the insurance
trust fund established under KRS 61.701. Notwithstanding any
minimum compensation requirements provided by law, the deductions
provided by this paragraph shall be made, and the compensation of the
member shall be reduced accordingly.
3. Each employer shall submit payroll reports, contributions lists, and other
data as may be required by administrative regulation promulgated by the
board of trustees in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A.
4. Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions
made pursuant to this paragraph, and the payment of salary or
compensation less the deductions shall be a full and complete discharge
of all claims for services rendered by the person during the period
covered by the payment, except as to any benefits provided by KRS
Page 37 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
78.510 to 78.852. No member may elect whether to participate in, or
choose the contribution amount to accounts established pursuant to 26
U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the funds established in KRS 78.520, or the
insurance trust fund established under KRS 61.701. The member shall
have no option to receive the contribution required by this paragraph
directly instead of having the contribution paid to accounts established
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the funds established in KRS
78.520, or the insurance trust fund established under KRS 61.701. No
member may receive a rebate or refund of contributions. If a member
establishes a membership date prior to July 1, 2003, pursuant to KRS
61.552(2) or (3) or who is subject to the benefits provided under
subsection (4)(b) or (d) of this section, then this paragraph shall not
apply to the member and all contributions previously deducted in
accordance with this paragraph shall be refunded to the member without
interest. The contribution made pursuant to this paragraph shall not act
as a reduction or offset to any other contribution required of a member
or recipient under KRS 78.510 to 78.852.
5. The board of trustees, at its discretion, may direct that the contributions
required by this paragraph be accounted for within accounts established
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the funds established in KRS
78.520, or the insurance trust fund established under KRS 61.701,
through the use of separate accounts.
(4) (a) The premium required to provide hospital and medical insurance plan
coverage under this section shall be paid wholly or partly from funds
contributed by:
1. The recipient of a retirement allowance, by payroll deduction from his
or her retirement allowance, electronic funds transfer, or by other
Page 38 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
method;
2. The insurance trust fund established by KRS 61.701 or accounts
established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the funds
established in KRS 78.520;
3. Another state-administered retirement system, including the systems
administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems, under a reciprocal
arrangement, except that any portion of the premium paid from the
funds specified by subparagraph 2. of this paragraph under a reciprocal
agreement shall not exceed the amount that would be payable under this
section if all the member's service were in the County Employees
Retirement System. If the board provides for cross-referencing of
insurance premiums, the employer's contribution for the working
member or spouse shall be applied toward the premium, and the
insurance trust fund established under KRS 61.701 or accounts
established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the funds
established in KRS 78.520, shall pay the balance; or
4. A combination of the fund sources described by subparagraphs 1. to 3.
of this paragraph.
Group rates under the hospital and medical insurance plan shall be made
available to the spouse, each dependent child, and each disabled child,
regardless of the disabled child's age, of a recipient who is a former member
or the beneficiary, if the premium for the hospital and medical insurance for
the spouse, each dependent child, and each disabled child, or beneficiary is
paid by payroll deduction from the retirement allowance, electronic funds
transfer, or by another method. For purposes of this subsection only, a child
shall be considered disabled if he or she has been determined to be eligible for
federal Social Security disability benefits or meets the dependent disability
Page 39 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
standard established by the Department of Employee Insurance in the
Personnel Cabinet.
(b) For a member who began participating in the system prior to July 1, 2003, the
monthly contribution rate shall be paid by the system from the funds specified
under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection and shall be equal to a percentage of
the single premium to cover the retired member as follows:
1. One hundred percent (100%) of the monthly premium for single
coverage shall be paid for a retired member who had two hundred forty
(240) months of service or more upon retirement or for a retired member
who when he or she was an employee was disabled as a direct result of
an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 78.510(48) or as a result of a
duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621;
2. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the monthly premium for single coverage
shall be paid for a retired member who had less than two hundred forty
(240) months of service but at least one hundred eighty (180) months of
service upon retirement, provided such retired member agrees to pay the
remaining twenty-five percent (25%) by payroll deduction from his or
her retirement allowance, electronic funds transfer, or by another
method;
3. Fifty percent (50%) of the monthly premium for single coverage shall be
paid for a retired member who had less than one hundred eighty (180)
months of service but had at least one hundred twenty (120) months of
service upon retirement, provided such retired member agrees to pay the
remaining fifty percent (50%) by payroll deduction from his or her
retirement allowance, electronic funds transfer, or by another method; or
4. Twenty-five percent (25%) of the monthly premium for single coverage
shall be paid for a retired member who had less than one hundred twenty
Page 40 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
(120) months of service but had at least forty-eight (48) months of
service upon retirement, provided such retired member agrees to pay the
remaining seventy-five percent (75%) by payroll deduction from his or
her retirement allowance, electronic funds transfer, or by another
method.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, for a member participating
in the system prior to July 1, 2003, who:
1. Dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 78.510
or dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621, the
monthly premium shall be paid for his or her spouse so long as the
spouse remains eligible for a monthly retirement benefit;
2. Becomes totally and permanently disabled as defined in KRS 78.5524 as
a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 78.510 or
becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS
61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the
monthly premium shall be paid for his or her spouse so long as the
member and the spouse individually remain eligible for a monthly
retirement benefit; and
3. Dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 78.510,
dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621,
becomes totally and permanently disabled as defined in KRS 78.5524 as
a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 78.510, or
becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS
61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the
monthly premium shall be paid for each dependent child as defined in
KRS 78.510, so long as the member remains eligible for a monthly
retirement benefit, unless deceased, and each dependent child
Page 41 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
individually remains eligible under KRS 78.510.
(d) 1. For a member who began participating in the system prior to July 1,
2003, who was determined to be in a hazardous position in the County
Employees Retirement System, or who is receiving a retirement
allowance based on General Assembly service, the funds specified under
paragraph (a)2. of this subsection shall also pay a percentage of the
monthly contribution rate sufficient to fund the premium costs for
hospital and medical insurance coverage for the spouse and for each
dependent child of a recipient.
2. The percentage of the monthly contribution rate paid for the spouse and
each dependent child of a recipient who was in a hazardous position or
who is receiving a retirement allowance based on General Assembly
service in accordance with subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be
based solely on the member's service in a hazardous position using the
formula in paragraph (b) of this subsection, except that for any recipient
of a retirement allowance from the County Employees Retirement
System who was contributing to the system on January 1, 1998, for
service in a hazardous position, the percentage of the monthly
contribution shall be based on the total of hazardous service and any
nonhazardous service as a police or firefighter with the same agency, if
that agency was participating in the County Employees Retirement
System but did not offer hazardous duty coverage for its police and
firefighters at the time of initial participation.
(e) For members who begin participating in the system on or after July 1, 2003:
1. Participation in the insurance benefits provided under this section shall
not be allowed until the member has earned at least one hundred twenty
(120) months of service in the state-administered retirement systems,
Page 42 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
except that for members who begin participating in the system on or
after September 1, 2008, participation in the insurance benefits provided
under this section shall not be allowed until the member has earned at
least one hundred eighty (180) months of service credited under KRS
78.615(1) or another state-administered retirement system;
2. A member who meets the minimum service requirements as provided by
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall upon retirement be eligible for
the following monthly contribution rate to be paid on his or her behalf,
or on behalf of the spouse or dependent of a member with service in a
hazardous position, from the funds specified under paragraph (a)2. of
this subsection:
a. For members with service in a nonhazardous position who do not
meet the career threshold, a monthly insurance contribution of ten
dollars ($10) for each year of service as a participating employee
in a nonhazardous position;
b. For members with service in a nonhazardous position who meet
the career threshold, a monthly insurance contribution towards the
health plans offered to retirees who are not eligible for Medicare
of forty dollars ($40) for each year of service as a participating
employee in a nonhazardous position and a monthly insurance
contribution towards the health plans offered to retirees who are
eligible for Medicare of ten dollars ($10) for each year of service
as a participating employee in a nonhazardous position. The
monthly insurance contribution payable to retirees eligible for
Medicare under this subdivision shall be adjusted as necessary so
that it is equivalent to the monthly contribution amount computed
under subdivision a. of this subparagraph as adjusted by
Page 43 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
subparagraph 6.a. of this paragraph;
c. For members with service in a hazardous position who do not meet
the career threshold, a monthly insurance contribution of fifteen
dollars ($15) for each year of service as a participating employee
in a hazardous position;
d. For members with service in a hazardous position who meet the
career threshold, a monthly insurance contribution towards the
health plans offered to retirees who are not eligible for Medicare
of fifty dollars ($50) for each year of service as a participating
employee in a hazardous position and a monthly insurance
contribution towards the health plans offered to retirees who are
eligible for Medicare of fifteen dollars ($15) for each year of
service as a participating employee in a hazardous position. The
monthly insurance contribution payable to retirees eligible for
Medicare under this subdivision shall be adjusted as necessary so
that it is equivalent to the monthly contribution amount computed
under subdivision c. of this subparagraph as adjusted by
subparagraph 6.a. of this paragraph; and
e. Upon the death of the retired member, the beneficiary, if the
beneficiary is the member's spouse, shall be entitled to a monthly
insurance contribution of ten dollars ($10) for each year of service
the member attained as a participating employee in a hazardous
position;
3. The minimum service requirement to participate in benefits as provided
by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be waived for a member who
receives a satisfactory determination of a hazardous disability that is a
direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 78.510(48) and
Page 44 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
the member shall be entitled to the benefits payable under this
subsection as though the member had twenty (20) years of service in a
hazardous position;
4. The minimum service required to participate in benefits as provided by
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be waived for a member who is
disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621
and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(b), and the
member shall be entitled to the benefits payable under this subsection as
though the member had twenty (20) years of service in a nonhazardous
position;
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph, the minimum service
requirement to participate in benefits as provided by subparagraph 1. of
this paragraph shall be waived for a member who dies as a direct result
of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 78.510(48), who becomes
totally and permanently disabled as defined in KRS 78.5524 as a direct
result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 78.510, who dies as a
result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621, or who
becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS
61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a),
and the premium for the member, the member's spouse, and for each
dependent child as defined in KRS 78.510 shall be paid in full by the
systems so long as the member, member's spouse, or dependent child
individually remains eligible for a monthly retirement benefit;
6. Except as provided by subparagraph 5. of this paragraph, the monthly
insurance contribution amount shall be increased:
a. On July 1 of each year by one and one-half percent (1.5%). The
increase shall be cumulative and shall continue to accrue after the
Page 45 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
member's retirement for as long as a monthly insurance
contribution is payable to the retired member or beneficiary but
shall not apply to any increase in the contribution attributable to
the increase specified by subdivision b. of this subparagraph; and
b. On January 1 of each year by five dollars ($5) for members who
have accrued an additional full year of service as a participating
employee beyond the career threshold, subject to the following
restrictions:
i. The additional insurance contribution provided by this
subdivision shall only be applied to the monthly contribution
amounts provided under subparagraph 2.b. and d. of this
paragraph;
ii. The additional insurance contribution provided by this
subdivision shall only be payable towards the health plans
offered by the system to retirees who are not eligible for
Medicare or for reimbursements provided to retirees not
eligible for Medicare pursuant to subsection (6)(a)2. of this
section; and
iii. In order for the annual increase to occur as provided by this
subdivision, the funding level of retiree health benefits for
the system in which the employee is receiving the additional
insurance contribution shall be at least ninety percent (90%)
as of the most recent actuarial valuation and be projected by
the actuary to remain ninety percent (90%) for the year in
which the increase is provided;
7. The benefits of this paragraph provided to a member whose participation
begins on or after July 1, 2003, shall not be considered as benefits
Page 46 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
protected by the inviolable contract provisions of KRS 78.852. The
General Assembly reserves the right to suspend or reduce the benefits
conferred in this paragraph if in its judgment the welfare of the
Commonwealth so demands;
8. An employee whose membership date is on or after September 1, 2008,
who retires and is reemployed in a regular full-time position required to
participate in the system or the Kentucky Retirement Systems shall not
be eligible for health insurance coverage or benefits provided by this
section and shall take coverage with his or her employing agency during
the period of reemployment in a regular full-time position; and
9. As used in[For purposes of] this paragraph:
a. "Career threshold" for a member with service in a nonhazardous
position means twenty-seven (27) years of service credited under
KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), 78.615(1), or another state-
administered retirement system and for a member with service in a
hazardous position means the service requirements specified by
KRS 78.5514(2)(a)2. or (3)(b), or 78.5516(6)(b), as applicable;
and
b. "Funding level" means the actuarial value of assets divided by the
actuarially accrued liability expressed as a percentage that is
determined and reported by the system's actuary in the annual
actuarial valuation.
(f) For members with service in another state-administered retirement system
who select hospital and medical insurance plan coverage through the system:
1. The system shall compute the member's combined service, including
service credit in another state-administered retirement system, and
calculate the portion of the member's premium monthly contribution rate
Page 47 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
to be paid by the funds specified under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection
according to the criteria established in paragraphs (a) to (e) of this
subsection. Each state-administered retirement system shall pay
annually to the insurance trust fund established under KRS 61.701 the
portion of the system's cost of the retiree's monthly contribution for
single coverage for hospital and medical insurance plan which shall be
equal to the percentage of the member's number of months of service in
the other state-administered retirement plan divided by his or her total
combined service and in conjunction with the reciprocal agreement
established between the system and the other state-administered
retirement systems. The amounts paid by the other state-administered
retirement plans and by the County Employees Retirement System from
funds specified under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection shall not be
more than one hundred percent (100%) of the monthly contribution
adopted by the respective boards of trustees;
2. A member may not elect coverage for hospital and medical benefits
through more than one (1) of the state-administered retirement systems;
and
3. A state-administered retirement system shall not pay any portion of a
member's monthly contribution for medical insurance unless the
member is a recipient or annuitant of the plan.
(5) Premiums paid for hospital and medical insurance coverage procured under
authority of this section shall be exempt from any premium tax which might
otherwise be required under KRS Chapter 136. The payment of premiums by the
funds described by subsection (4)(a)2. of this section shall not constitute taxable
income to an insured recipient. No commission shall be paid for hospital and
medical insurance procured under authority of this section.
Page 48 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
(6) (a) The board shall promulgate an administrative regulation to establish a medical
insurance reimbursement plan to provide reimbursement for hospital and
medical insurance plan premiums of recipients of a retirement allowance who:
1. Are not eligible for the same level of hospital and medical benefits as
recipients living in Kentucky and having the same Medicare hospital
and medical insurance eligibility status; or
2. Are eligible for retiree health subsidies as provided by subsection (4)(e)
of this section, except for those recipients eligible for full premium
subsidies under subsection (4)(e)5. of this section. The reimbursement
program as provided by this subparagraph shall be available to the
recipient regardless of the hospital and medical insurance plans offered
by the systems.
(b) An eligible recipient shall file proof of payment for hospital and medical
insurance plan coverage with the retirement office. Reimbursement to eligible
recipients shall be made on a quarterly basis. The recipient shall be eligible
for reimbursement of substantiated medical insurance premiums paid by the
recipient to obtain coverage for an amount not to exceed the total monthly
contribution rate determined under subsection (4) of this section. For
reimbursements provided under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection, the full
subsidy under subsection (4)(e)2. of this section shall be reimbursed by the
system to the recipient up to the amount individually paid by the recipient to
obtain coverage. In the case of recipients of a retirement allowance from a
nonhazardous position, the reimbursement shall be limited to the amount paid
by the recipient to obtain single coverage.
(c) For purposes of recipients described by paragraph (a)1. of this subsection, the
plan shall not be made available if all recipients are eligible for the same
coverage as recipients living in Kentucky.
Page 49 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
Section 5. KRS 78.5540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A retired member whose disability retirement was discontinued pursuant to KRS
78.5528 and who is reemployed by an employer participating in the system or the
Kentucky Retirement Systems prior to his or her normal retirement date shall have
his or her accounts combined upon termination for determining eligibility for
benefits. If the member is eligible for retirement, the member's service and
creditable compensation earned as a result of his or her reemployment shall be used
in the calculation of benefits, except that the member's final compensation shall not
be less than the final compensation last used in determining his or her retirement
allowance. The member shall not change beneficiary or payment option
designations.
(2) (a) If a retired member accepts employment or begins serving as a volunteer with
an employer participating in the systems administered by Kentucky
Retirement Systems or the County Employees Retirement System within
twelve (12) months of his or her retirement date, the retired member shall
notify the Authority and the participating employer shall submit the
information required or requested by the Authority to confirm the individual's
employment or volunteer status. The retired member shall not be required to
notify the Authority regarding any employment or volunteer service with a
participating agency that is accepted after twelve (12) months following his or
her retirement date.
(b) If the retired member is under a contract to provide services as an independent
contractor or leased employee to an employer participating in the systems
administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or the County Employees
Retirement System within twelve (12) months of his or her retirement date,
the member shall submit a copy of that contract to the Authority, and the
Authority shall determine if the member is an independent contractor or
Page 50 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
leased employee for purposes of retirement benefits. The retired member and
the participating employer shall submit the information required or requested
by the Authority to confirm the individual's status as an independent
contractor or leased employee. The retired member shall not be required to
notify the Authority regarding any services entered into as an independent
contractor or leased employee with a participating agency that the employee
enters into after twelve (12) months following his or her retirement date.
(3) Retired members of the County Employees Retirement System who returned to
work with an employer that participates in the County Employees Retirement
System or Kentucky Retirement Systems prior to September 1, 2008, shall be
governed by the provisions of KRS 61.637(1) to (16).
(4) The following shall apply to retired members of the County Employees Retirement
System who are reemployed on or after September 1, 2008, by an agency
participating in the systems administered by the County Employees Retirement
System or the Kentucky Retirement Systems:
(a) If a retired member is receiving a retirement allowance from the County
Employees Retirement System, or has filed the forms required to receive a
retirement allowance from the County Employees Retirement System, and is
employed in a regular full-time position required to participate in the County
Employees Retirement System or one (1) of the systems administered by the
Kentucky Retirement Systems or is employed in a position that is not
considered regular full-time with an employer participating in the County
Employees Retirement System or in one (1) of the systems administered by
the Kentucky Retirement Systems within one (1) month following the
member's initial retirement date, the member's retirement shall be voided, and
the member shall repay to the system all benefits received, including any
health insurance benefits. If the retired member is returning to work in a
Page 51 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
regular full-time position required to participate in the County Employees
Retirement System:
1. The member shall contribute to a member account established for him or
her in the County Employees Retirement System or in one (1) of the
systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems, and
employer contributions shall be paid on behalf of the member by the
participating employer to the system; and
2. Upon subsequent retirement, the member shall be eligible for a
retirement allowance based upon total service and creditable
compensation, including any additional service or creditable
compensation earned after his or her initial retirement was voided;
(b) If a retired member is receiving a retirement allowance from the County
Employees Retirement System and is employed in a regular full-time position
required to participate in the County Employees Retirement System or in one
(1) of the systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems after a
one (1) month period following the member's initial retirement date, the
member may continue to receive his or her retirement allowance during the
period of reemployment subject to the following provisions:
1. If a member is reemployed by a participating employer within twelve
(12) months of the member's retirement date, the participating employer
shall certify in writing on a form prescribed by the Authority that no
prearranged agreement existed between the employee and employer
prior to the employee's retirement for the employee to return to work
with the participating employer. If the participating employer fails to
complete the certification or the Authority determines a prearranged
agreement exists, the member's retirement shall be voided and the
provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall apply to the member
Page 52 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
and the employer. For purposes of this paragraph:
a. If an elected official is reelected to a new term of office in the
same position as the elected official held prior to retirement and
takes office within twelve (12) months of his or her retirement
date, he or she shall be deemed by the Authority as having a
prearranged agreement; and
b. Employment that is accepted by the retired member after twelve
(12) months following the member's retirement date shall not
constitute a prearranged agreement under this paragraph;
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS Chapter 78 to the contrary,
the member shall not contribute to the system and shall not earn any
additional benefits for any work performed during the period of
reemployment;
3. Except as provided by KRS 70.291 to 70.293, 95.022, Section 1 of this
Act, and 164.952 and except for any retiree employed as a school
resource officer as defined by KRS 158.441 or as a Kentucky guardian
as defined by KRS 158.4431, the employer shall pay employer
contributions as specified by KRS 78.5536 and 78.635 on all creditable
compensation earned by the employee during the period of
reemployment. The additional contributions paid shall be used to reduce
the unfunded actuarial liability of the system; and
4. Except as provided by KRS 70.291 to 70.293, 95.022, Section 1 of this
Act, and 164.952 and except for any retiree employed as a school
resource officer as defined by KRS 158.441 or as a Kentucky guardian
as defined by KRS 158.4431, the employer shall be required to
reimburse the system for the cost of the health insurance premium paid
by the system to provide coverage for the retiree, not to exceed the cost
Page 53 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
of the single premium. Effective July 1, 2015, local school boards shall
not be required to pay the reimbursement required by this subparagraph
for retirees employed by the board for eighty (80) days or less during the
fiscal year. Effective August 1, 2024, the Department of Education shall
pay for the health reimbursements required by this subparagraph for a
retiree who participated in a hazardous position prior to July 1, 2003, in
the County Employees Retirement System or in one (1) of the systems
administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems, and who is
reemployed by a local school board;
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, a retired member
who qualifies as a volunteer for an employer participating in the County
Employees Retirement System or the Kentucky Retirement Systems and who
is receiving reimbursement of actual expenses, a nominal fee for his or her
volunteer services, or both, shall not be considered an employee of the
participating employer and shall not be subject to paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subsection if:
1. Prior to the retired member's most recent retirement date, he or she did
not receive creditable compensation from the participating employer in
which the retired member is performing volunteer services;
2. Any reimbursement or nominal fee received prior to the retired
member's most recent retirement date has not been credited as creditable
compensation to the member's account or utilized in the calculation of
the retired member's benefits;
3. The retired member has not purchased or received service credit under
any of the provisions of KRS 78.510 to 78.852 for service with the
participating employer for which the retired member is performing
volunteer services; and
Page 54 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
4. Other than the status of volunteer, the retired member does not become
an employee, leased employee, or independent contractor of the
employer for which he or she is performing volunteer services for a
period of at least twelve (12) months following the retired member's
most recent retirement date.
If a retired member, who provided volunteer services with a participating
employer under this paragraph violates any provision of this paragraph, then
he or she shall be deemed an employee of the participating employer as of the
date he or she began providing volunteer services and both the retired member
and the participating employer shall be subject to paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subsection for the period of volunteer service;
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, any mayor or member of a city
legislative body shall not be required to resign from his or her position as
mayor or as a member of the city legislative body in order to begin drawing
benefits from the systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems
or the County Employees Retirement System or subject to any provision of
this section as it relates solely to his or her service as a mayor or member of
the city legislative body, if the mayor or member of a city legislative body:
1. Has not participated in the County Employees Retirement System prior
to retirement, but is otherwise eligible to retire from the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System or the State Police Retirement System; or
2. Has been or is participating in the County Employees Retirement
System and is at least sixty-two (62) years of age. If a mayor or member
of a city legislative body who is at least sixty-two (62) years of age
retires from the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems
or the County Employees Retirement System but remains in office after
his or her effective retirement date, the mayor or member of the city
Page 55 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
legislative body shall not accrue any further service credit or benefits in
the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or the
County Employees Retirement System for any employment occurring
on or after the effective retirement date;
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, any current or future part-time
adjunct instructor for the Kentucky Fire Commission who has not participated
in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System prior to retirement, but who is
otherwise eligible to retire from the County Employees Retirement System,
shall not be:
1. Required to resign from his or her position as a part-time adjunct
instructor for the Kentucky Fire Commission in order to begin drawing
benefits from the County Employees Retirement System; or
2. Subject to any provision of this section as it relates solely to his or her
service as a part-time adjunct instructor for the Kentucky Fire
Commission;
(f) If a member is receiving a retirement allowance from the County Employees
Retirement System and enters into a contract or becomes a leased employee of
an employer under contract with an employer participating in the County
Employees Retirement System or one (1) of the systems administered by the
Kentucky Retirement Systems:
1. At any time following retirement, if the Authority determines the
employment arrangement does qualify as an independent contractor or
leased employee, the member may continue to receive his or her
retirement allowance during the period of the contract;
2. Within one (1) month following the member's initial retirement date, if
the Authority determines the employment arrangement does not qualify
as an independent contractor or leased employee, the member's
Page 56 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
retirement shall be voided in accordance with paragraph (a) of this
subsection;
3. After one (1) month but within twelve (12) months following the
member's initial retirement, if the Authority determines the employment
arrangement does not qualify as an independent contractor or leased
employee and that a prearranged agreement existed between the member
and the agency for the member to return to work with the agency, the
member's retirement shall be voided in accordance with paragraph (a) of
this subsection;
4. After a twelve (12) month period following the member's initial
retirement, the member may continue to receive his or her retirement
allowance during the period of the contract and the member shall not be
required to notify the Authority or submit any documentation for
purposes of this section to the Authority; and
5. After twelve (12) months or more following the retired member's
retirement date, the initiation of a contract or the initial date of the
leased employment of a retired member by a participating agency shall
not constitute a prearranged agreement under this subsection;
(g) The Authority shall issue a final determination regarding a certification of the
absence of a prearranged agreement or the retired member's qualification as
an independent contractor or leased employee as required under this section
no later than thirty (30) days after the retired member and participating
employer provide all required forms and additional information required by
the Authority; and
(h) Retired members of one (1) of the systems administered by Kentucky
Retirement Systems who are reemployed by an employer in the County
Employees Retirement System on or after September 1, 2008, shall not be
Page 57 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 589/GA
eligible to earn a second retirement account in the County Employees
Retirement System for his or her service to the employer.
(5) The Authority shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement the
requirements of this section, including incorporating by reference Authority-
prescribed forms that a retired member and participating agency shall provide the
systems under subsections (1) and (4) of this section.
(6) (a) As used in this section, "reemployment" or "reinstatement"[ as used in this
section] shall not include a retired member who has been ordered reinstated
by the Personnel Board under authority of KRS 18A.095.
(b) 1. A retired member who has been ordered reinstated without loss of pay
by the Personnel Board under authority of KRS 18A.095 or by court
order or by order of the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights and
accepts employment by an agency participating in the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System, State Police Retirement System, or
County Employees Retirement System shall void his or her retirement
by reimbursing the system in the full amount of his or her retirement
allowance payments received, including any health insurance benefits
paid to or on behalf of the member.
2. Within twelve (12) months of the date of the final order of the Personnel
Board, the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights, or the court, the
member shall repay the system the full amount of his or her retirement
allowance payments and health insurance benefits by lump sum or enter
into an agreement with the Authority for repayment by installments.
3. Once the system has been fully reimbursed for the benefits paid to the
member and on the member's behalf, additional contributions and
service credit based on the reinstated employment shall be added to the
member's account.
Page 58 of 58
HB058910.100 - 2007 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:41 PM GA